Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 14 Licensed Activities
19-14-10.
Agent for service of process.

Every licensee shall appoint, and thereafter maintain, in this state a resident agent with authority to accept process for the licensee in this state, including the process of garnishment.

The appointment shall be filed with the director, or the director’s designee, electronically through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System. The designation of an agent shall provide all contact information, including the business address, street, and number, if any, of the resident agent. Thereafter, if the resident agent changes his or her business address or other contact information, the licensee shall, within ten (10) days after any change, file electronically through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System notice of the change setting forth the agent’s current business address or other contact information.

If the resident agent dies, resigns, or leaves the state, the licensee shall make a new appointment and file the new appointment electronically through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System. The original designation shall not be revoked until new appointment shall have been given to some other competent person resident in this state and filed with the department.

Service of process upon the resident agent shall be deemed sufficient service upon the licensee.

Any licensee who fails to appoint a resident agent and file the appointment electronically through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System, or fails to replace a resident agent for a period of thirty (30) days from vacancy, shall be liable for a penalty not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) and shall be subject to suspension or revocation of the license.

Upon the filing of any appointment required by this section, a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) shall be paid to the director for the use of the state.

Any licensee that is a corporation and complies with the provisions of chapter 1.2 of title 7 is exempt from the filing requirements of this section. Any licensee that is a limited partnership or limited liability company and complies with the provisions of chapters 13 and 16 of title 7 is exempt from the requirements of this section.

Any process, including the process of garnishment, may be served upon the director, or the director’s designee, as agent of the licensee in the event that no resident agent can be found upon whom service can be made, or in the event that the licensee has failed to designate a resident agent as required, and process may be served by leaving a copy of the process with a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) which shall be included in the taxable costs of the suit, action, or proceeding, in the hands of the director, or the director’s designee. This manner of service upon the licensee shall be sufficient, provided that notice of service and a copy of the process shall be immediately sent by certified mail by the plaintiff, or the plaintiff’s attorney of record, to the licensee at the latest address filed with the director, or the director’s designee. If the licensee has not filed his or her address pursuant to this chapter, notice of service shall be given in any manner that the court in which the action is pending may order as affording the licensee reasonable opportunity to defend the action or to learn of the garnishment. Nothing contained in this section shall limit or affect the right to serve process upon a licensee in any other manner now or hereafter permitted by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 18; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 18; P.L. 2014, ch. 106, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 125, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 1, § 6; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 3, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 3, effective June 29, 2022.

19-14-11.
Prohibition or transfer or assignment of license.

No license shall be transferable or assignable. A change in ownership of less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the voting stock or equity interests of a licensee shall not be considered a transfer or assignment of the license. A change in ownership of twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the voting stock or equity interests shall require notification to the director within fifteen (15) days of the change in ownership. Change in ownership application procedures, including reasonable response time requirements, shall be established by regulations promulgated by the director, or the director’s designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52.

19-14-12.
Place of business — Branch offices — Name changes.

Additional places of business may be maintained under the same license upon written application to the director, or the director’s designee, for the establishment of an additional branch office. A separate application must be filed for each additional branch office being requested. At the time of the application, the licensee shall pay to, and for the use of, the state an investigation fee as provided for in §

19-14-3

. Upon the filing of the application, the director, or the director’s designee, shall investigate the facts, and if he or she finds that the requirements for licensure have been met, the director, or the director’s designee, shall grant authority for the operation of the business under the license at the branch location. If the director, or the director’s designee, shall not so find, he or she shall deny the licensee permission to establish the branch location in a manner consistent with the licensing application process. Upon approval of a branch location request, the licensee shall pay an additional annual licensing fee for each branch location in the manner consistent with the licensing application process.

Whenever a licensee wishes to change his or her place of business or branch location to a street address other than that designated in the license, the licensee shall notify the director, or the director’s designee, in the manner directed by the director, or the director’s designee, prior to conducting business at that location. Unless the director, or the director’s designee, finds that the new location is not in the best interests of the public, the director, or the director’s designee, will reflect the change in the records of the department. At the time of notification, the licensee shall pay to the state the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) as a processing fee.

No licensee shall transact the business provided for by this chapter under any other name than that named in the license or branch certificate. Whenever a licensee shall wish to change the name, the licensee shall make written application to the director, or the director’s designee. If the director, or the director’s designee, shall find that the change of name is appropriate and all requirements for the name change have been met by the licensee, the director, or the director’s designee, shall approve the change and reflect the new name in the records of the department. At the time of application for change of name, the licensee shall pay to, and for the use of, the state the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) as a processing fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2014, ch. 106, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 125, § 3.

19-14-13.
Revocation of license.

The director, or the director’s designee, may, upon ten (10) days’ notice to the licensee, stating his or her intent to revoke and the grounds for revocation, and upon reasonable opportunity for the licensee to be heard, revoke any license issued under this chapter, upon finding that:

The licensee has failed to comply with any demand, ruling, order, or requirement of the director, or the director’s designee, lawfully made pursuant to and within the authority of this title;

The licensee has violated any provisions of this title or §

6-26-2

, or any rule or regulation lawfully made by the director, or the director’s designee, under and within the authority of this chapter;

Any fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time of the original application for the license, would have warranted the director, or the director’s designee, in refusing originally to issue the license;

The licensee has committed any fraud, engaged in any dishonest activities, or made any misrepresentation;

The licensee has violated any provisions of this title or any regulation issued pursuant to this title;

The licensee has made a false statement in the application for the license or failed to give a true reply to a question in the application; or

The licensee has demonstrated incompetency or untrustworthiness to act as a licensee pursuant to this chapter.

The burden of proving the existence of these facts or conditions as grounds for revocation of a license under this section shall be upon the director, or the director’s designee. The director, or the director’s designee, if he or she has reasonable cause to believe that the grounds for revocation exist, may subpoena and investigate the business, books, and records of the licensee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52.

19-14-14.
Revocation by default.

The director, or the director’s designee, may revoke any license without a hearing by default if the licensee fails to respond to notifications informing the licensee of a failure to pay the annual license fee; maintain in effect the required bond or bonds; or maintain net worth requirements as required by this title.

For the purposes of revocation by default, the director, or the director’s designee, shall send, in writing, to the licensee and to the licensee’s registered attorney for service of process at their current respective addresses according to the records of the department, notice of the deficiency and potential revocation of the license. Should the licensee, or the licensee’s registered attorney, fail to respond within fifteen (15) days of the notification, the director, or the director’s designee, may revoke the license by default and without hearing. The director, or the director’s designees, shall notify the licensee of such revocation in writing.

Any action taken under this section may be appealed pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2012, ch. 65, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 145, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 106, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 125, § 3.

19-14-15.
Suspension of license.

The director, or the director’s designee, may, upon three (3) days’ notice and an opportunity for hearing, suspend any license for a period not exceeding thirty (30) days, pending investigation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52.

19-14-16.
Surrender of license.

Any licensee may surrender any license or branch certificate(s) by delivering to the director, or the director’s designee, electronic notice through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System surrendering the license or branch certificate(s). The surrender shall not affect the licensee’s civil or criminal liability for acts committed prior to the surrender. Electronic notice through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System of any surrender must be filed with the director, or the director’s designee, within thirty (30) days of the termination of the business authorized by this chapter at the surrendered location. The surrender of any license does not affect the licensee’s requirement to file an annual report with the fifty-five dollar ($55.00) filing fee. This report shall be filed within thirty (30) days of the surrender of the license. The licensee shall give electronic notification through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System to the director, or the director’s designee, within twenty-four (24) hours from termination of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 19; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 3, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 3, effective June 29, 2022.

19-14-17.
Contracts unimpaired by revocation, suspension, or surrender of license.

Any revocation, suspension, or surrender of a license shall not impair or affect the obligation of any preexisting lawful contract between the licensee and any customer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52.

19-14-18.
Reinstatement of license.

Every license issued under this chapter shall remain in force and effect until it shall have been surrendered, revoked, or suspended in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The director, or the director’s designee, shall have authority on his or her own initiative to reinstate suspended licenses or to issue new licenses to a licensee whose licenses have been revoked if no fact or condition then exists that clearly would have warranted the director, or the director’s designee, in refusing originally to issue the license under this chapter. A license reinstatement fee equal to one half (1/2) of the annual license fee shall be paid to the director to and for the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52.

19-14-19.
Filing findings on revocation or suspension.

Whenever the director, or the director’s designee, shall revoke or suspend a license issued pursuant to this chapter, the director shall file, in his or her office, a written order to that effect containing the evidence and the reason(s) supporting the revocation or suspension, and serve upon the licensee a copy thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52.

19-14-20.
Books, accounts, and records.

The licensee shall keep and use any books, accounts, and records, that may be maintained by optical imaging, as will enable the director, or the director’s designee, to determine whether the licensee is complying with the provisions of this title and with the rules and regulations lawfully made by the director, or the director’s designee.

If the licensee maintains its records outside of the state of Rhode Island, the licensee shall be responsible for all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by the examining personnel to examine such records.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52.

19-14-21.
Advertising and misrepresentations.

No licensee or other person shall advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, telecast, or broadcast, or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, telecast, or broadcast, in any manner whatsoever any false, misleading, or deceptive statement or representation with regard to the rates, terms, or conditions for licensed activities. The director, or the director’s designee, may order any licensee or other person to desist from any conduct that he or she shall find to be a violation of the foregoing provisions.

The director, or the director’s designee, may require that rates of interest or charges, if stated by a licensee, be stated fully and clearly in any manner the director, or the director’s designee, may deem necessary to prevent misunderstanding of the rates or charges by prospective customers.

The licensee shall disclose in any written or oral advertisements or representation disseminated primarily in this state, the type of license held.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52.

19-14-22.
Reporting requirements.

Each licensee shall annually file a report with the director, or the director’s designee, on a quarterly basis, giving any relevant information that the director, or the director’s designee, may reasonably require concerning the business and operations during the reporting period of each licensed place of business conducted by the licensee within the state. The report shall be submitted through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and attested to by the entity. To the extent that the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System does not require submission of quarterly reports of condition, each licensee shall, annually, on or before March 31, file a report with the director, or the director’s designee, giving any relevant information that the director, or the director’s designee, may reasonably require concerning the business and operations during the preceding calendar year of each licensed place of business conducted by the licensee within the state. At the time of renewal of the license, the sum of fifty-five dollars ($55.00) per license and fifty-five dollars ($55.00) per branch certificate shall be paid by the licensee to the director for the use of the state. Any licensee who or that shall delay transmission of any report required by the provisions of this title beyond the limit, unless additional time is granted, in writing, for good cause, by the director, or the director’s designee, shall pay a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each day of the delay. In lieu of a report by any licensed mortgage loan originator, the director, or the director’s designee, may accept a report by the licensed lender or licensed loan broker who or that employed the licensed mortgage loan originator for the activities of the licensed mortgage loan originator while employed by such lender or loan broker during the applicable calendar year.

Any licensee shall, within twenty-four (24) hours after actual knowledge, notify the director, or the director’s designee, in writing, of the occurrence of any of the following events: the institution of bankruptcy, receivership, reorganization, or insolvency proceedings regarding a licensee; the institution of any adverse government action against a licensee; or any felony indictment or conviction of any licensee or any officers, directors, owners, employees, members, or partners thereof, as the case may be.

Each mortgage loan originator licensee shall, on or before March 31, 2010, and every March 31st thereafter, file with the director, or the director’s designee, evidence acceptable to the director, or the director’s designee, that said loan originator licensee has filed with the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry a report of condition, which shall be in such form and shall contain such information as the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry may require.

Both the mortgage loan originator and his or her licensed employer shall promptly notify the director, or the director’s designee, in writing, within fifteen (15) business days of the termination of employment or services of a mortgage loan originator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 19; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 3, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 3, effective June 29, 2022.

19-14-23.
Examinations and investigations.

For the purpose of discovering violations of this title or securing information lawfully required, the director, or the director’s designee(s), may at any time investigate the loans and business and examine the books, accounts, records, and files used therein, of every licensee and person who shall be engaged in any activity that requires a license under this title, whether the person shall act, or claim to act, as principal or agent, or under or without the authority of this title. For that purpose, the director, or the director’s designee(s), shall have free access to the offices and places of business, books, accounts, paper, records, files, and safes, of all such persons. The director, or the director’s designee(s), shall have authority to require the attendance of, and to examine under oath, any person whose testimony may be required relative to the loans or the business or to the subject matter of any examination, investigation, or hearing.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall make an examination of the affairs, business, office, and records of each licensee and branch location as often as is necessary, based upon all relevant factors, including the volume of activity within the state. The department shall provide a report to the legislature after July 1, 2017, but no later than December 31, 2017, regarding the timing of examinations conducted pursuant to this section and shall make recommendations regarding the sufficiency of conducting examinations based on these factors versus on a stated, periodic basis. The director, or the director’s designee, may accept, in lieu of an examination of the business of a licensed mortgage loan originator, the examination by the director, or the director’s designee, of the licensed lender(s) or licensed loan broker who employ the licensed mortgage loan originator and/or who employed the licensed mortgage loan originator during the period under examination. The total cost of an examination made pursuant to this section shall be paid by the licensee or person being examined and shall include the following expenses:

One hundred fifty percent (150%) of the total salaries and benefits plus one hundred percent (100%) for the travel and transportation expenses for the examining personnel engaged in the examinations. The cost of an examination of a mortgage loan originator licensee shall be limited to twenty-five percent (25%) of the total salary and benefits for the personnel engaged in an examination specific to a mortgage loan originator. The fees shall be paid to the director to, and for the use of, the state. The examination fees shall be in addition to any taxes and fees otherwise payable to the state;

All reasonable technology costs related to the examination process. Technology costs shall include the actual cost of software and hardware utilized in the examination process and the cost of training examination personnel in the proper use of the software or hardware; and

All necessary and reasonable education and training costs incurred by the state to maintain the proficiency and competence of the examination personnel. All such costs shall be incurred in accordance with appropriate state of Rhode Island regulations, guidelines, and procedures.

All expenses incurred pursuant to subsections (b)(2) and (b)(3) shall be allocated equally to each licensee, other than licensed mortgage loan originators, no more frequently than annually and shall not exceed an annual average assessment of fifty dollars ($50.00) per company for any given three calendar-year (3) period. All revenues collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited as general revenues. That assessment shall be in addition to any taxes and fees otherwise payable to the state.

The provisions of §

19-4-3

shall apply to records of examinations or investigations of licensees; provided, however, the director, or the director’s designee, is authorized to make public the number of valid consumer complaints as determined by the director, or the director’s designee, filed against the licensee for a twelve-month (12) period immediately preceding the request for the information; and provided, further, that promptly following the completion of any examination under §

19-14-23(b)

, the director, or the director’s designee, shall provide to the person examined a copy of the written report of the examination, together with a notice requiring the person examined to file a written response or rebuttal to the comments and recommendations contained in the examination report within thirty (30) days of receipt thereof or such longer period as the director, or the director’s designee, may specify.

If the director, or the director’s designee, has reason to believe that any person required to be licensed under this chapter is conducting a business without having first obtained a license under this chapter, or who, after the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license is conducting that business, the director, or the director’s designee, may issue an order to that person commanding him or her to cease and desist from conducting that business. The order shall provide an opportunity to request a hearing to be held not sooner than three (3) days after issuance of that order to show cause why the order should not become final. Any order issued pursuant to this section shall become final if no request for a hearing is received by the director, or the director’s designee, within thirty (30) days of the issuance of the order. The order may be served on any person by mailing a copy of the order, certified mail, return receipt requested, and first-class mail to that person at any address at which that person has done business or at which that person lives. Any hearing held pursuant to this section shall be governed in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42. If that person fails to comply with an order of the director, or the director’s designee, after being afforded an opportunity for a hearing, the superior court for Providence County has jurisdiction upon complaint of the department to restrain and enjoin that person from violating this chapter.

The director may impose an administrative assessment, as well as the penalties provided for under §

19-14-26

, against any person named in an order issued under subsection (e) or, in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to §

19-14-30

, against any person who violates, or participates in the violation of, any of the applicable provisions of this title, or any regulation promulgated pursuant to any provisions of this title. The amount of the administrative assessment may not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation of this chapter or each act or omission that constitutes a basis for issuing the order. Any person aggrieved by an administrative assessment shall have the opportunity to request a hearing to be held in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42 within thirty (30) days of the imposition of such administrative assessment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 1999, ch. 156, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 70, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 145, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 106, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 125, § 3.

19-14-24.
Tying with other business.

No licensee shall condition any sale on the requirement that the consumer purchase any other product or service from a specified provider including those providers with whom the licensee is sharing office space.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 3, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 3, effective June 29, 2022.

19-14-25.
Transactions and place of business limited by license — Remote locations.

No licensee shall transact the business provided for by this chapter under any other name or at any other place of business than that named in the license or branch certificate, unless that place is for the exclusive convenience of the customer or meets the requirements for a remote location. The fact that closings occur at a place other than a licensed place of business shall not be deemed to be a violation of this section.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary under this chapter or chapter 14.10 of this title, employees of a licensee may perform services for the licensee or act as a mortgage loan originator from a remote location subject to each of the following requirements:

The employee is subject to the supervision of the licensee;

The remote location is the employee’s residence or other location identified in the records of the licensee and is within a reasonable distance of a place of business named in the licensee’s license or branch certificate, as established by regulations adopted by the director or the director’s designee;

The licensee has written policies and procedures for supervision of, and employs appropriate risk-based monitoring and oversight process of work performed by, employees working from remote locations;

Access to the licensee’s computer platforms and to customer information is in accordance with the licensee’s comprehensive written information security plan. The licensee must maintain appropriate safeguards for licensee and consumer data, information, and records, including the use of secure virtual private networks (“VPNs”) where appropriate;

No in-person customer interaction occurs at the remote location, and the licensee will not designate the remote location to consumers or customers as a business location unless the remote location is properly licensed as a branch;

Physical records related to the licensee’s business, including consumer information, are not maintained at the remote location;

The licensee must ensure consumer and licensee information and records remain accessible and available for regulatory oversight and exams; and

The licensee must provide training to keep all conversations about, and with, consumers conducted from a remote location confidential, as if conducted from a licensed commercial location, and to ensure remote employees work in an environment conducive and appropriate to that privacy.

A remote location shall not be considered a branch of the licensee; however, activities conducted at a remote location shall be subject to examination under this chapter and §

19-14.10-5

.

The director, or the director’s designee, shall have the authority to promulgate rules to establish requirements and standards relating to remote locations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 3, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 3, effective June 29, 2022.

19-14-26.
Penalty for violations.

If a person other than a licensee engages in activity for which licensure is required by this title with or on behalf of a resident in violation of this chapter, the department may assess a civil penalty against the person in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day of violation and/or may order that the person cease and desist from all activities requiring licensure.

If a licensee materially violates or participates in the violation of any of the applicable provisions of this title, or any regulation promulgated under this title, the department may assess a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation or in the case of identifiable measured transactions per transaction, or by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both. Each violation constitutes a separate offense. Complaints under the provisions of this chapter may be made by the director, or the director’s designee, and shall not be required to give surety for costs. The attorney general shall prosecute all criminal activities under this chapter.

A civil penalty under this section continues to accrue until the earlier of the following:

The date the violation ceases; or

A date specified by the department.

In addition to the remedies set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, upon proof of a material violation by a licensee, the department may take any of the following actions:

Suspend or revoke a license or registration under this chapter;

Order a person to cease and desist from doing activity for which a license or registration is required with or on behalf of a resident;

Request the court to appoint a receiver for the assets of a licensee or registrant;

Request the court to issue temporary, preliminary, or permanent injunctive relief against a licensee or registrant;

Recover on the bond or security posted by the licensee or registrant; or

Impose necessary or appropriate conditions on the conduct of business activity with or on behalf of a resident.

All actions of the department under this section shall be taken in accordance with the requirements of chapter 35 of title 42 (the administrative procedures act).

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 1997, ch. 98, § 9; P.L. 2000, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 246, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 2, § 10.

19-14-26.1.
Additional penalties.

Any person who makes or brokers a loan not invalid for any other reason who knowingly violates §

19-14-2

shall, in the discretion of the court, forfeit and have no right to collect or receive any interest, fees, or charges whatsoever.

In the case of any unlicensed transaction involving lending or loan brokering activities, the amount of interest, fees, or charges previously collected shall be credited to the principal balance of the loan then due and owing or paid to the debtor, at the option of the holder of the loan.

In the case of any unlicensed check cashing, sale of check, or electronic money transfer transaction, the amount of any fees or charges previously collected shall be paid to the person from whom the fee or charge was collected. In the event that the person who collected the fee or charge is unable to identify the person from whom the fee or charge was collected, the fee or charge shall be paid to the director to and for the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 155, § 2.

19-14-27.
Modification or repeal of chapter.

This chapter, or any part of this chapter, may be modified, amended, or repealed so as to effect a cancellation or alteration of any license or right of a licensee hereunder, provided that the cancellation or alteration shall not impair or affect the obligation of any pre-existing lawful contract between any licensee and any customer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52.

19-14-28.
Appeal from director.

Any applicant or licensee aggrieved by an action of the director, or the director’s designee, in denying an application for a license or in revoking or suspending a license, or by any order or decision of the director, or the director’s designee, shall have the right to appeal the action, order, or decision pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52.

19-14-29.
Appropriations — Fees.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums it may deem sufficient for clerical assistance and necessary expenses in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sums appropriated, or so much of the sums as may from time to time be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director, or the director’s designee. All fees received under the provisions of this title shall be turned over to the general treasurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52.

19-14-30.
Rules and regulations.

The director, or the director’s designee, may adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the implementation and administration of the provisions of this chapter. The director, or the director’s designee, shall adopt and amend reasonable rules and regulations, not later than March 31, 2008, as may be necessary to effectuate and implement the provisions of §§

19-14-1

,

19-14-2

,

19-14-3

,

19-14-4

,

19-14-6

,

19-14-7

,

19-14-9

,

19-14-22

,

19-14-23

and

19-14-33

pertaining to mortgage loan originators in order that those provisions pertaining to mortgage loan originators are in effect and force on January 1, 2009.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 244, § 1.

19-14-31.
Pre-existing contracts.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to impair or affect the obligation of any contract or loan lawfully entered into prior to July 1, 1995.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52.

19-14-32.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 52.

19-14-33.
Compliance with federal law governing licensed activities.

Each licensee shall comply with all applicable federal laws, rules, and regulations, as amended, governing activities conducted under its license.

Each licensee shall exercise due diligence in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to §

19-14-30

in confirming its compliance with applicable state/federal statutes and/or regulations at all phases of activities conducted under the license.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 16, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 244, § 2.

19-14-34.
Resident agent — Loss payee.

Each licensee shall maintain a resident agent in this state who shall have authority to endorse insurance claim checks on behalf of the licensee.

A licensee that has not and will not be included as a loss payee on any insurance policy may be exempted from the provisions of subsection (a) of this section and §§

5-38-26

and

27-5-3.3

. An applicant that wishes to obtain an exemption must clearly state in its business plan that it is not a loss payee on any insurance policy and must provide the department with a statement that it will not be designated as a loss payee on any insurance policy. A licensee that obtains an exemption should expect that compliance will be evaluated on examination.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 6, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 6, effective June 29, 2022.